California, session 20252026, SB991.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1569.493 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:1569.493. (a) When the department substantiates a violation in a residential care facility for the elderly that constitutes abuse under paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) of Section 1569.269, the department shall categorize and cite the violation according to the specific type of abuse established by the evidence.(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), the department shall categorize and cite violations as one or more of the following, as applicable:(1) Physical abuse, as defined in Section 15610.63 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(2) Abandonment, as defined in Section 15610.05 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(3) Abduction, as defined in Section 15610.06 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(4) Financial abuse, as defined in Section 15610.30 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(5) Isolation, as defined in Section 15610.43 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(6) Mental suffering, as defined in Section 15610.53 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(7) Neglect, as defined in Section 15610.57 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(8) Undue influence, as defined in Section 15610.70 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(c) This section does not do any of the following:(1) Limit the department’s authority to assess civil penalties under Section 1569.49 or any other law.(2) Require the department to assess a civil penalty where none is otherwise authorized by law.(3) Alter the elements required to substantiate abuse under existing law.(d) The department shall ensure that citations categorized pursuant to this section are reflected in any public-facing transparency, licensing, or enforcement databases maintained by the department.(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2027.